California statutes. Education Code
 equal to five thousand five hundred forty-five dollars ($5,545) multiplied by the then current fiscal year’s second principal apportionment period average daily attendance in transitional kindergarten. Commencing with the 2026–27 fiscal year, the add-on computed pursuant to this paragraph shall be adjusted by the percentage change applied pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (d). It is the intent of the Legislature that the costs to meet the requirements of paragraph (3) of subdivision (g) of Section 48000 be supported by the add-on computed pursuant to this paragraph.

(h) (1) The Superintendent shall compute an add-on to the total sum of a school district’s or charter school’s base, supplemental, and concentration grants equal to the amount of funding a school district or charter school received from funds allocated pursuant to the Home-to-School Transportation program, as set forth in former
 Article 2 (commencing with Section 39820) of Chapter 1 of Part 23.5, former Article 10 (commencing with Section 41850) of Chapter 5, and the Small School District Transportation program, as set forth in former Article 4.5 (commencing with Section 42290), as those articles read on January 1, 2013, for the 2012–13 fiscal year. A school district or charter school shall not receive a total funding amount from this add-on greater than the total amount received by the school district or charter school for those programs in the 2012–13 fiscal year. The amount computed pursuant to this subdivision shall reflect the reduction specified in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 42238.03.

(2) If a home-to-school transportation joint powers agency, established pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 6500) of Chapter 5 of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code for purposes of providing pupil transportation, received an apportionment
 directly from the Superintendent from any of the funding sources specified in paragraph (1) for the 2012–13 fiscal year, the joint powers agency may identify the member local educational agencies and transfer entitlement to that funding to any of those member local educational agencies by reporting to the Superintendent, on or before September 30, 2015, the reassignment of a specified amount of the joint powers agency’s 2012–13 fiscal year entitlement to the member local educational agency. Commencing with the 2015–16 fiscal year, the Superintendent shall compute an add-on to the total sum of a school district’s or charter school’s base, supplemental, and concentration grants equal to the amount of the entitlement to funding transferred by the joint powers agency to the member school district or charter school.

(3) Commencing in the 2023–24 fiscal year, the add-on amounts referenced in paragraphs (1) and (2) shall receive the annual
 cost-of-living adjustment specified in paragraph (2) of subdivision (d).

(i) (1) The sum of the local control funding formula rates computed pursuant to subdivisions (c) to (f), inclusive, shall be multiplied by:

(A) For school districts, the average daily attendance of the school district in the corresponding grade level ranges computed pursuant to Section 42238.05, excluding the average daily attendance computed pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 42238.05 for purposes of the computation specified in subdivision (d).

(B) For charter schools, the total current year average daily attendance in the corresponding grade level ranges.

(2) The amount computed pursuant to Article 4 (commencing with Section 42280)
 shall be added to the amount computed pursuant to paragraphs (1) to (4), inclusive, of subdivision (d), as multiplied by subparagraph (A) or (B) of paragraph (1), as appropriate.

(j) The Superintendent shall adjust the sum of each school district’s or charter school’s amount determined in subdivisions (g) to (i), inclusive, pursuant to the calculation specified in Section 42238.03, less the sum of the following:

(1) (A) For school districts, the property tax revenue received pursuant to Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 75) and Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 95) of Part 0.5 of Division 1 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(B) For charter schools, the in-lieu property tax amount provided to a charter school pursuant to Section 47635.

(2) The amount, if any, received pursuant to Part 18.5 (commencing with Section 38101) of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(3) The amount, if any, received pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 16140) of Part 1 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(4) Prior years’ taxes and taxes on the unsecured roll.

(5) Fifty percent of the amount received pursuant to Section 41603.

(6) The amount, if any, received pursuant to the Community Redevelopment Law (Part 1 (commencing with Section 33000) of Division 24 of the Health and Safety Code), less any amount received pursuant to Section 33401 or 33676 of the Health and Safety Code that is used for land acquisition, facility
 construction, reconstruction, or remodeling, or deferred maintenance and that is not an amount received pursuant to Section 33492.15, or paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 33607.5, or Section 33607.7 of the Health and Safety Code that is allocated exclusively for educational facilities.

(7) The amount, if any, received pursuant to Sections 34177, 34179.5, 34179.6, 34183, and 34188 of the Health and Safety Code.

(8) Revenue received pursuant to subparagraph (B) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (e) of Section 36 of Article XIII of the California Constitution.

(k) A school district shall annually transfer to each of its charter schools funding in lieu of property taxes pursuant to Section 47635.

(l) (1) This section
 does not authorize a school district that receives funding on behalf of a charter school pursuant to Section 47651 to redirect this funding for another purpose unless otherwise authorized in law pursuant to paragraph (2) or pursuant to an agreement between the charter school and its chartering authority.

(2) A school district that received funding on behalf of a locally funded charter school in the 2012–13 fiscal year pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 42605, Section 42606, and subdivision (b) of Section 47634.1, as those sections read on January 1, 2013, or a school district that was required to pass through funding to a conversion charter school in the 2012–13 fiscal year pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 42606, as that section read on January 1, 2013, may annually redirect for another purpose a percentage of the amount of the funding received on behalf of that charter school. The percentage of
 funding that may be redirected shall be determined pursuant to the following computation:

(A) (i) Determine the sum of the need fulfilled for that charter school pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 42238.03 in the then current fiscal year for the charter school.

(ii) Determine the sum of the need fulfilled in every fiscal year before the then current fiscal year pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 42238.03 adjusted for changes in average daily attendance pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 42238.03 for the charter school.

(iii) Subtract the amount computed pursuant to paragraphs (1) to (3), inclusive, of subdivision (a) of Section 42238.03 from the amount computed for that charter school under the local control funding formula
 entitlement computed pursuant to subdivision (i) of this section.

(iv) Compute a percentage by dividing the sum of the amounts computed pursuant to clauses (i) and (ii) by the amount computed pursuant to clause (iii).

(B) Multiply the percentage computed pursuant to subparagraph (A) by the amount of funding the school district received on behalf of the charter school in the 2012–13 fiscal year pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 42605, Section 42606, and subdivision (b) of Section 47634.1, as those sections read on January 1, 2013.

(C) The maximum amount that may be redirected shall be the lesser of the amount of funding the school district received on behalf of the charter school in the 2012–13 fiscal year pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 42605, Section 42606, and
 subdivision (b) of Section 47634.1, as those sections read on January 1, 2013, or the amount computed pursuant to subparagraph (B).

(3) Commencing with the 2013–14 fiscal year, a school district operating one or more affiliated charter schools shall provide each affiliated charter school schoolsite with no less than the amount of funding the schoolsite received pursuant to the charter school block grant in the 2012–13 fiscal year.

(m) Any calculations in law that are used for purposes of determining if a local educational agency is an excess tax school entity or basic aid school district, including, but not limited to, this section and Sections 41544, 42238.03, 47632, 47660, 47663, 48310, and 48359.5, and Section 95 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, shall exclude the revenue received pursuant to subparagraph (B) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (e) of Section 36 of Article XIII of
 the California Constitution.

(n) The funds apportioned pursuant to this section and Section 42238.03 shall be available to implement the activities required pursuant to Article 4.5 (commencing with Section 52059.5) of Chapter 6.1 of Part 28 of Division 4.

(o) A school district that does not receive an apportionment of state funds pursuant to this section, as implemented pursuant to Section 42238.03, excluding funds apportioned pursuant to the requirements of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (e) of Section 42238.03, shall be considered a “basic aid school district” or an “excess tax entity.”

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 8, Sec. 30.   (AB 121)   Effective June 27, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

42238.021.

Notwithstanding any other law, for the 2020–21 fiscal year, the adjustments required pursuant to paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 2574, subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 2574, subdivision (b) of Section 2575.1, paragraph (2) of subdivision (d) of Section 42238.02, and subdivision (b) of Section 42287 shall instead be zero.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 24, Sec. 29.   (SB 98)   Effective June 29, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

42238.022.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, for the 2021–22 fiscal year, the adjustments required pursuant to paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 2574, subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 2574, subdivision (b) of Section 2575.1, paragraph (2) of subdivision (d) of Section 42238.02, and subdivision (b) of Section 42287 shall be 2.7 percent and shall be calculated by first assuming the adjustment referenced in Section 42238.021 is 2.31 percent instead of zero.

(b) (1) For the 2026–27 fiscal year, the department shall increase the rates provided in paragraphs (1), (2), and (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 2574, base grant rates provided in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 2574, and
 base grant rates provided in subdivision (d) of Section 42238.02 by 1.44 percent. These adjustments shall be calculated by multiplying the corresponding rates for the 2025–26 fiscal year, as determined by paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 2574, subparagraphs (A) and (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 2574, and paragraph (2) of subdivision (d) of Section 42238.02, as applicable, by 1.44 percent.

(2) For the 2026–27 fiscal year, the rate change provided pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 2575.4
 shall
 include the adjustments made pursuant to paragraph (1).

(3) Notwithstanding any other law, for purposes of calculating subsequent fiscal year funding rates, the adjustments made pursuant to this subdivision shall be included in their respective prior year funding rates commencing with the 2027–28 fiscal year.

(4) Local educational agencies incurring costs related to providing employees with up to 14 weeks of paid pregnancy disability leave pursuant to Sections 44965 and 45193 shall use the funds calculated pursuant to this subdivision to reimburse those costs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 250, Sec. 15.   (SB 133)   Effective September 18, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

42238.023.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, for purposes of calculating local control funding formula entitlements pursuant to Sections 42238.02, 42238.03, 2574, and 2576, as applicable, if the Superintendent determines that a local educational agency’s attendance yield in the 2019–20 fiscal year is greater than the attendance yield in the 2021–22 school year, the Superintendent shall adjust the local educational agency’s 2021–22 fiscal year average daily attendance in the manner described in subdivision (b). This determination shall be made by the following calculation for each local educational agency:

(1) Divide the total average daily attendance in the 2019–20 fiscal year reported for both the second period and the annual period apportionment, as applicable, by
 total enrollment from the California Longitudinal Pupil Achievement Data System Fall 1 Certification for the 2019–20 fiscal year. This amount shall not exceed a value of one.

(2) Divide the total average daily attendance in the 2021–22 fiscal year reported for both the second period and annual period apportionment, as applicable, by total enrollment from the California Longitudinal Pupil Achievement Data System Fall 1 Certification for the 2021–22 fiscal year. This amount shall not exceed a value of one.

(3) Divide the amount determined in paragraph (1) by the amount determined in paragraph (2). If the resulting quotient is greater than one, the local educational agency’s 2021–22 fiscal year average daily attendance shall be adjusted pursuant to subdivision (b).

(b) (1) For county offices of
 education, the Superintendent shall multiply the county office of education’s 2021–22 fiscal year reported average daily attendance by the amount determined in paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) for the purpose of calculating the 2021–22 fiscal year annual apportionment pursuant to Sections 2574 and 2576.

(2) For school districts, the Superintendent shall make the following adjustments:

(A) Multiply the school district’s 2021–22 fiscal year reported average daily attendance by the amount determined in paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) for purposes of calculating the 2021–22 fiscal year annual apportionment pursuant to Sections 42238.02 and 42238.03.

(B) Multiply the school district’s 2021–22 fiscal year reported average daily attendance by the amount determined in paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) for purposes of
 calculating prior year average daily attendance or the average attendance of the three most recent prior fiscal years pursuant to Sections 42238.05 and 42280 in the 2022–23 to 2024–25 fiscal years, inclusive.

(3) For charter schools, excluding a charter school classified as a nonclassroom-based charter school as of the 2021–22 fiscal year second principal apportionment certification pursuant to Section 47612.5, the Superintendent shall multiply the charter school’s 2021–22 fiscal year reported average daily attendance by the amount determined in paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) for the purpose of calculating the 2021–22 fiscal year annual apportionment pursuant to Sections 42238.02 and 42238.03.

(c) (1) The calculations pursuant to subdivisions (a) and (b) shall only be applied to school districts and county offices of education that meet the following
 requirements:

(A) By no later than November 1, 2021, offered an independent study program to all
 pupils, for the 2021–22 school year, consistent with the requirements of Section 51745, and provided the notification to parents and guardians of all enrolled pupils pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (h) of Section 51747 and subparagraph (A) of paragraph (8) of subdivision (b) of Section 51749.6.

(B) By no later than November 1, 2021, adopted written policies for providing
 instruction to pupils through independent study, and
 have verifiable documentation substantiating the provision of opportunities for live interaction and synchronous instruction pursuant to Section 51745.5, if applicable, or the provision of activities or pupil work product of a pupil while out on independent study that is equivalent to in-person instruction pursuant to Sections 51747 and 51749.5.

(2) In
 the 2021–22 school year, a school district or county office of education that received a waiver by June 15, 2022, pursuant to subdivision (g) of Section 51745, from independent study requirements, or a school district or county office of education that entered into a contract with a county office of education or an interdistrict transfer agreement with another school district pursuant to subdivision (f) of Section 51745 for the offering of independent study, shall be deemed to have met the requirements specified in paragraph (1).

(3) (A) On or before November 1, 2022, a school district or county office of education shall certify its compliance with paragraph (1)
 or (2) using a form the department shall provide for this purpose. A school district or county office of education that does not certify compliance shall not receive the 2021–22 average daily attendance calculation pursuant to this Section.

(B) The department shall make this form available to school districts and county offices of education on or before October 11, 2022.

(4) The 2022–23 fiscal year Guide for Annual Audits of K–12 Local Education Agencies and State Compliance Reporting, the Controller shall incorporate verification of compliance with the requirements specified in
 subparagraphs
 (A) and (B) of paragraph (1), which may include reviewing the local educational agency’s annual audit for the 2021–22 fiscal year to determine compliance with those requirements.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 571, Sec. 19.   (AB 185)   Effective September 27, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

42238.024.

(a) Commencing with the 2023–24 fiscal year, the sum of three hundred million dollars ($300,000,000) is hereby appropriated each fiscal year from the General Fund to the Superintendent for allocation for the Local Control Funding Formula Equity Multiplier apportionment in the manner and for the purposes set forth in this section. Commencing with the 2024–25 fiscal year, the amount appropriated pursuant to this subdivision shall be adjusted each fiscal year by the percentage change applied pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (d) of Section 42238.02 for that fiscal year.

(b) (1) Funds appropriated pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be made available by the Superintendent to eligible local educational agencies for allocation to schoolsites
 eligible pursuant to paragraph (2) for evidence-based services and supports for pupils, with a demonstration of how the resulting services and supports are increased or improved in comparison to services and supports that would have been provided at the schoolsites if the funding were not provided. Funds appropriated pursuant to subdivision (a) shall supplement, not supplant, funding provided for these schoolsites for purposes of the local control funding formula pursuant to Section 2574, 2575, or 42238.02, the Expanded Learning Opportunities Program pursuant to Section 46120, the Literacy Coaches and Reading Specialists Grant Program established pursuant to Section 137 of Chapter 52 of the Statutes of 2022, and the California Community Schools Partnership Act (Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 8900) of Part 6 of Division 1 of Title 1).

(2) For schoolsites with prior year nonstability rates greater than 25 percent and prior year
 socioeconomically disadvantaged pupil rates of greater than 70 percent, funding shall be allocated on a per-unit basis of the schoolsite’s total prior year adjusted cumulative enrollment. The per-unit funding amount is based on total statewide eligible enrollment and the amount of funds available, as reported in the stability rate data file.

(3) An eligible schoolsite shall not receive funding pursuant to paragraph (2) of less than fifty thousand dollars ($50,000), adjusted each fiscal year by percentage change applied pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (d) of Section 42238.02 for that fiscal year.

(4) A schoolsite deemed eligible pursuant to paragraph (2) shall instead be deemed ineligible if it meets either of the following criteria:

(A) The schoolsite has closed in the year in which the funds are to be
 allocated, as reported pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (f) of Section 60900.

(B) Commencing with the 2024–25 fiscal year, the local educational agency generated funding for a schoolsite pursuant to paragraph (2) due to a pupil being enrolled in the school district office.

(5) Unspent funds from any fiscal year provided to a local educational agency with a schoolsite that has closed, as reported pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (f) of Section 60900, shall be returned to the department. Local educational agencies shall report the total amount of unspent funds in accordance with instructions and forms prescribed and furnished by the Superintendent.

(c) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Eligible local
 educational agency” means a school district, county office of education, or charter school that generates a local control funding formula entitlement pursuant to Sections 2574, 2575, or 42238.02, excluding a charter school classified as a nonclassroom-based charter school as of the prior fiscal year’s second principal apportionment certification pursuant to Section 47612.5.

(2) “Nonstability rate” means the percentage of pupils who are either enrolled for less than 245 continuous days between July 1 and June 30 of the prior school year, or exited from a school between July 1 and June 30 of the prior school year due to either truancy, expulsion, or for unknown reasons and without stable subsequent enrollment at another school as identified in the stability rate data file.

(3) “Prior year adjusted cumulative enrollment” means any enrollment with a start date in the school year in
 transitional kindergarten, kindergarten, and grades 1 to 12, inclusive, as identified in the stability rate data file.

(4) “Schoolsite” means an individual school in an eligible local educational agency, excluding the school district office.

(5) “Socioeconomically disadvantaged pupil rate” means the percentage of pupils that meet any of the following criteria for the prior school year:

(A) Neither of the pupil’s parents has a high school diploma.

(B) The pupil is eligible for free or reduced-price meals under the federal National School Lunch Program, including by direct certification.

(C) The pupil is a migratory child for purposes of Part C (commencing with Section 6391) of Subchapter I
 of Chapter 70 of Title 20 of the United States Code.

(D) The pupil is a homeless child or youth.

(E) The pupil is a foster youth.

(F) The pupil is enrolled in a county juvenile court school.

(6) “Stability rate data file” means the initial publication of the annual file published by the department for the prior school year that will be used to determine a schoolsite’s prior year adjusted cumulative enrollment, nonstability rate, and socioeconomically disadvantaged rate for the purposes of calculating funding pursuant to this section for an eligible local educational agency.

(d) Notwithstanding Section 10231.5 of the Government Code, by February 1, 2025, and each February 1 thereafter, the
 department, using existing resources, shall submit an annual report to the relevant policy and fiscal committees of the Legislature, the state board, and the Department of Finance that includes the following information on pupil outcomes at schoolsites that receive funding pursuant to this section and statewide pupil outcomes:

(1) Pupil subgroup data captured in the stability rate data file, based on enrollment at the eligible schoolsite.

(2) Number of truant pupils captured in the stability rate data file and enrolled at the eligible schoolsite.

(3) Number of expelled pupils captured in the stability rate data file and enrolled at the eligible schoolsite.

(4) Number of pupils whose reasons for exit from the schoolsite are unknown, as captured in the
 stability rate data file, and enrolled at the eligible schoolsite.

(5) Performance of the eligible schoolsites on California School Dashboard state indicators, disaggregated by pupil subgroup.

(e) For purposes of making the computations required by Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution, the appropriations made by subdivision (a) shall be deemed to be “General Fund revenues appropriated for school districts,” as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 41202, for the fiscal year for which the appropriation is made, and included within the “total allocations to school districts and community college districts from General Fund proceeds of taxes appropriated pursuant to Article XIIIB,” as defined in subdivision (e) of Section 41202, for the fiscal year for which the appropriation is made.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 38, Sec. 20.   (SB 153)   Effective June 29, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

42238.025.

(a) In the 2013–14 fiscal year, the Superintendent shall compute an economic recovery target rate for each school district and charter school equal to the sum of the following:

(1) (A) For each school district, the school district’s revenue limit in the 2012–13 fiscal year as computed pursuant to this article, as this article read on January 1, 2013, divided by the 2012–13 fiscal year average daily attendance of the school district computed pursuant to Section 42238.05. For purposes of this section, average daily attendance shall include any applicable revenue limit average daily attendance and shall be considered final for purposes of this section as of the annual apportionment for the 2012–13 fiscal year, as calculated for purposes of the
 certification required on or before February 20, 2014, pursuant to Sections 41332 and 41339.

(B) For each charter school, the charter school’s general purpose funding as computed pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 47633) of Chapter 6 of Part 26.8 of Division 4, as that article read on January 1, 2013, and the in-lieu property tax amount provided to the charter school pursuant to Section 47635, as that section read on January 1, 2013, divided by the 2012–13 fiscal year average daily attendance of the charter school computed pursuant to Section 42238.05. For purposes of this section, average daily attendance shall include any applicable charter school general purpose funding average daily attendance and shall be considered final for purposes of this section as of the annual apportionment for the 2012–13 fiscal year, as calculated for purposes of the certification required on or before February 20, 2014, pursuant to Sections 41332 and
 41339.

(C) The amounts determined pursuant to subparagraphs (A) and (B) shall not reflect the deficit factor adjustments set forth in Section 42238.146, as that section read on January 1, 2013.

(D) The amounts determined pursuant to subparagraphs (A) and (B) shall be adjusted for the cost-of-living adjustment for the 2013–14 fiscal year pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (d) of Section 42238.02 and an annual average cost-of-living adjustment of 1.94 percent for the 2014–15 fiscal year to the 2020–21 fiscal year, inclusive.

(2) (A) For each school district and charter school, the sum of the entitlements from items contained in Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2012 for Items 6110-104-0001, 6110-105-0001, 6110-108-0001, 6110-111-0001, 6110-124-0001, 6110-128-0001, 6110-137-0001,
 6110-144-0001, 6110-156-0001, 6110-181-0001, 6110-188-0001, 6110-189-0001, 6110-190-0001, 6110-193-0001, 6110-195-0001, 6110-198-0001, 6110-204-0001, 6110-208-0001, 6110-209-0001, 6110-211-0001, 6110-212-0001, 6110-227-0001, 6110-228-0001, 6110-232-0001, 6110-240-0001, 6110-242-0001, 6110-243-0001, 6110-244-0001, 6110-245-0001, 6110-246-0001, 6110-247-0001, 6110-248-0001, 6110-260-0001, 6110-265-0001, 6110-267-0001, 6110-268-0001, 6360-101-0001, 2012–13 fiscal year funding for the Class Size Reduction Program pursuant to Chapter 6.10 (commencing with Section 52120) of Part 28 of Division 4, as it read on January 1, 2013, and 2012–13 fiscal year funding for pupils enrolled in community day schools who are mandatorily expelled pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 48915, divided by the 2012–13 fiscal year average daily attendance of the school district computed pursuant to Section 42238.05. For purposes of this subparagraph, 2012–13 fiscal year entitlements shall be considered final as of the annual
 apportionment for the 2012–13 fiscal year, as calculated for purposes of the certification required on or before February 20, 2014, pursuant to Sections 41332 and 41339.

(B) The amounts determined pursuant to this subdivision shall not be adjusted for the reduction set forth in Section 12.42 of the Budget Act of 2012.

(b) Of the amounts computed for school districts pursuant to subdivision (a), the Superintendent shall determine the funding rate per unit of average daily attendance above which fall not more than 10 percent of the total number of school districts statewide.

(c) The Superintendent shall compute a 2020–21 fiscal year local control funding formula rate for each school district and charter school equal to the amount computed pursuant to Section 42238.02 for the 2013–14 fiscal year, adjusted for an annual
 average cost-of-living adjustment of 1.94 percent for the 2014–15 fiscal year to the 2020–21 fiscal year, inclusive, divided by the 2013–14 fiscal year average daily attendance of the school district or charter school computed pursuant to Section 42238.05. For purposes of this subdivision, the amount computed pursuant to Section 42238.02 for the 2013–14 fiscal year shall be considered final as of the second principal apportionment for the 2013–14 fiscal year, as calculated for purposes of the certification required on or before July 2, 2014, pursuant to Sections 41335 and 41339.

(d) (1) For each school district and charter school that has a funding rate per unit of average daily attendance computed pursuant to subdivision (a) that is equal to, or below, the funding rate per unit of average daily attendance determined pursuant to subdivision (b), the Superintendent shall subtract the amount computed pursuant to subdivision
 (c) from the amount computed pursuant to subdivision (a). Each school district or charter school for which this calculation yields an amount greater than zero shall be eligible for an economic recovery target payment equal to the amount of the difference. A school district or charter school that has a funding rate per unit of average daily attendance calculated pursuant to subdivision (a) that exceeds the rate calculated pursuant to subdivision (b) shall not be eligible for an economic recovery target payment.

(2) Each school district or charter school eligible for an economic recovery target payment pursuant to paragraph (1) shall receive the following apportionments:

(A) For the 2013–14 fiscal year, one-eighth of the amount calculated pursuant to paragraph (1) multiplied by the 2012–13 fiscal year average daily attendance computed pursuant to Section 42238.05.

(B) For the 2014–15 fiscal year, one-quarter of the amount calculated pursuant to paragraph (1) multiplied by the 2012–13 fiscal year average daily attendance computed pursuant to Section 42238.05.

(C) For the 2015–16 fiscal year, three-eighths of the amount calculated pursuant to paragraph (1) multiplied by the 2012–13 fiscal year average daily attendance computed pursuant to Section 42238.05.

(D) For the 2016–17 fiscal year, one-half of the amount calculated pursuant to paragraph (1) multiplied by the 2012–13 fiscal year average daily attendance computed pursuant to Section 42238.05.

(E) For the 2017–18 fiscal year, five-eighths of the amount calculated pursuant to paragraph (1) multiplied by the 2012–13 fiscal year average daily attendance computed
 pursuant to Section 42238.05.

(F) For the 2018–19 fiscal year, three-quarters of the amount calculated pursuant to paragraph (1) multiplied by the 2012–13 fiscal year average daily attendance computed pursuant to Section 42238.05.

(G) For the 2019–20 fiscal year, seven-eighths of the amount calculated pursuant to paragraph (1) multiplied by the 2012–13 fiscal year average daily attendance computed pursuant to Section 42238.05.

(H) For the 2020–21 fiscal year and each fiscal year thereafter, the amount calculated pursuant to paragraph (1) multiplied by the 2012–13 fiscal year average daily attendance computed pursuant to Section 42238.05.

(3) In each fiscal year until a determination has been made that all school districts and charter schools equal or
 exceed the local control funding formula target computed pursuant to Section 42238.02, as determined by the calculation of a zero difference pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 42238.03, the economic recovery target payment apportioned to each eligible school district or charter school pursuant to paragraph (2) shall be added to the school district’s or charter school’s funding amounts that are continuously appropriated pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 42238.03 and included in the amount of funding that is subject to offset pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 42238.03. The amount apportioned pursuant to paragraph (2) shall not receive a cost-of-living adjustment.

(4) Commencing with the first fiscal year in which all school districts and charter schools are apportioned funding pursuant to Section 42238.02, the economic recovery target calculated pursuant to subparagraph (H) of paragraph (2) shall be included as an
 add-on to the amounts computed pursuant to subdivisions (c) to (i), inclusive, of Section 42238.02 and included in the amount of funding that is subject to offset pursuant to subdivision (j) of Section 42238.02. The amount included as an add-on pursuant to this paragraph shall not receive a cost-of-living adjustment.

(e) (1) The economic recovery target payment calculated pursuant to subparagraph (H) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (d) for a restructured charter school shall be the following:

(A) For a transferred charter school, the economic recovery target payment shall be equal to the amount calculated for the original charter school.

(B) For an acquiring charter school, the economic recovery target payment shall be equal to the sum of the amounts calculated for the original charter schools.
 This subparagraph shall become inoperative on July 1, 2026, unless its operation is extended by the Legislature.

(C) For a divided charter school, the economic recovery target payment shall be divided between the restructured portions of a divided charter school and the remaining portion of a divided charter school based on each charter school’s share of the combined average daily attendance of the charter schools computed pursuant to Section 42238.05 as of the second principal apportionment in the fiscal year immediately before the first fiscal year of instruction as a restructured charter school. Data regarding average daily attendance shall be provided by the charter school in a format prescribed by the Superintendent. The total average daily attendance attributable to the restructured and remaining portions of a divided charter school shall not exceed the total average daily attendance of the original charter school for the applicable
 fiscal year. The amounts shall be final as of the second principal apportionment for the first fiscal year of instruction as a restructured charter school and each fiscal year thereafter.

(2) The definitions in Section 47654 apply for purposes of this subdivision.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 48, Sec. 26.   (SB 114)   Effective July 10, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

42238.026.

(a) On or before January 1, 2026, the Legislative Analyst’s Office shall submit a report to the Legislature, in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code, on the effects of changing the pupil count methodology of the local control funding formula from average daily attendance to pupil enrollment. The report, at a minimum, shall analyze all of the following, to the extent data is available:

(1) The legislative history of the change from funding excused absences to funding based on average daily attendance pursuant to Senate Bill 727 (Chapter 855 of the Statutes of 1997), including legislative intent and any indications of inaccurate or inappropriate attendance reporting of excused absences.

(2) The impact on attendance of the change from funding excused absences to funding based on average daily attendance pursuant to Senate Bill 727 (Chapter 855 of the Statutes of 1997), including statewide attendance, and the equity impact of this change, including attendance by pupil subgroup, and attendance at local educational agencies with high percentages of pupils who are English learners, low-income pupils, and foster youth.

(3) The programmatic changes made by local educational agencies to increase attendance after the switch to funding based on average daily attendance pursuant to Senate Bill 727 (Chapter 855 of the Statutes of 1997).

(4) The methods used by other states to count pupils for education funding purposes and the ways in which other states create incentives for local educational agencies to encourage pupil attendance.

(5) A review of research regarding both of the following:

(A) Evidence-based approaches to improving pupil attendance.

(B) The extent to which a state’s method of funding affects pupil attendance rates.

(6) The fiscal, programmatic, and administrative impacts of changing the pupil count methodology of the local control funding formula from average daily attendance to pupil enrollment, including the effects on the state and local educational agencies.

(7) The potential impacts on pupil attendance of changing the pupil count methodology of the local control funding formula from average daily attendance to pupil enrollment, including the effects on the state and local educational agencies,
 including by pupil grade and pupil subgroups as described in Section 52052.

(8) How a change to enrollment-based funding would affect local educational agencies of varying sizes, locations, and pupil demographics.

(9) Alternative methods of changing the local control funding formula that would have a similar effect on local educational agencies serving a higher percentage of English learners, low-income pupils, and foster youth.

(10) Phase-in approaches to implement the cost of an enrollment-based funding model over several years that do not reduce the funding received by any local educational agency.

(11) If the pupil count methodology for the local control funding formula is changed, whether the state should continue using average daily attendance for
 the Proposition 98 funding calculation and other education programs, such as lottery funding.

(12) The impacts on Proposition 98 and the minimum funding guarantee set forth in Sections 8 and 8.5 of Article XVI of the California Constitution and its implementing statutes, and the ability of the local control funding formula with a pupil count methodology based on pupil enrollment to fund existing and ongoing public education obligations.
